Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.390

Comprehensive services for drug-affected and alcohol-affected mothers and infants.

The department and the department of health shall develop and expand comprehensive services for drug-affected and alcohol-affected mothers and infants. Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the expansion shall be in evidence-based, research-based, or consensus-based practices, and shall expand capacity in underserved regions of the state.

[ 2009 c 520 s 47; 2005 c 504 s 303.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Severability—Application—Construction—Captions, part headings, subheadings not law—Adoption of rules—Effective dates—2005 c 504: See notes following RCW 71.05.027.

Alphabetization—Correction of references—2005 c 504: See note following RCW 71.05.020.